apertium-eu-en/apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
    <pardef n="cl/othe__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othe</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othe</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othes</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="control__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ke/ep__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eps</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pt</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pt</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deal__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ie__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ig__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igs</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ug</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ug</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igging</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igging</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igging</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ive__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ives</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ived</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ived</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iving</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iving</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iving</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e r="LR" lm="burn"><i>burn</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="cancel"><i>cancel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pedal"><i>pedal</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="annul"><i>annul</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="control"><i>control</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="counsel" a="doriua"><i>counsel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="die"><i>d</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="lie"><i>l</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="vie"><i>v</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="dig"><i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="deal"><i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="deal with"><i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>with</l><r><g><b/>with</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="dispel"><i>dispel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="dream"><i>dream</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="expel"><i>expel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fulfil"><i>fulfil</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="keep on"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="keep"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="label"><i>label</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="lean"><i>lean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="leap"><i>leap</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="learn"><i>learn</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mean"><i>mean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="repel"><i>repel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="model"><i>model</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="patrol"><i>patrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pencil"><i>pencil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spiral"><i>spiral</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tunnel"><i>tunnel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="signal"><i>signal</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sleep"><i>sle</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="creep"><i>cre</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sweep"><i>swe</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tie"><i>t</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="travel"><i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="travel across"><i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="weep"><i>we</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="annul"><i>annul</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gel"><i>gel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="propel"><i>propel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="libel"><i>libel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="extol"><i>extol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="excel"><i>excel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shovel"><i>shovel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compel"><i>compel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="remodel"><i>remodel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
